Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Subchapter 3. Court Records Generally

§ 731.
English language.

Writs, processes, complaints, informations, indictments, pleas, answers, and entries in the courts, except technical terms, shall be in the English language.

§ 732.
Lost document or record.

When a court document, record, or file in an action pending in court is lost, mislaid, or destroyed, the court may order a duplicate document, record, or file to be filed under such conditions as the court prescribes. A duplicate document or record shall have the same validity and may be used in evidence in the same manner as the original document, record, or file.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 67

, § 7.

§ 733.
Preservation of attachment liens.

When real or personal estate is attached on such writ, the plaintiff may procure from the clerk of the town in which the estate was attached a certified copy of the writ, complaint and officer’s return thereon, and cause the same to be filed in such court.
The same proceedings shall thereupon be had, and the estate so attached held to respond to the judgment in the action, as though the original writ, complaint, and return were in court.

§§ 734-738.
Repealed. 2013, No. 67, § 15.

§ 739.
Record certified by successor in office.

When a recording officer has made a record but has omitted to make an official certificate thereof, any person subsequently holding the office may make such certificate.
Such certificate shall be as valid as if made by the officer who made the record, but shall not affect any intervening right.

§ 740.
Court records; dockets; certified copies.

The Supreme Court by administrative order or directive shall provide for the preparation, maintenance, recording, indexing, docketing, preservation, and storage of all court records and the provision, subject to confidentiality requirements of law or court rules, of certified copies of those records to persons requesting them.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Oct. 1, 1990; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 43;

2013, No. 67

, § 8.